California, session 20252026, SB1262.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 84041.5 is added to the Education Code, to read:84041.5. (a) Commencing with the 2027–28 fiscal year, a community college district’s annual unrestricted general fund balance for a fiscal year, as reported on its annual report filed in compliance with regulations adopted pursuant to Section 84040, shall not exceed 50 percent of its unrestricted general fund expenditures for that year, unless the community college district does all of the following: (1) Participates in the Part-Time Community College Faculty Health Insurance Program, as described in Article 9 (commencing with Section 87860) of Chapter 3 of Part 51.(2) Participates in the Community College Part-Time Faculty Office Hours Program, as described in Article 10 (commencing with Section 87880) of Chapter 3 of Part 51. (3) Has at least 75 percent of hours of credit instruction taught by full-time instructors, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 87482.6.(b) A community college district shall not transfer unrestricted general funds to another fund for the purpose of complying with subdivision (a) if either of the following applies:(1) The receiving fund has an existing balance of 33 percent or more of the community college district’s unrestricted general fund expenditures for that fiscal year. (2) The transfer of the unrestricted general funds would cause the receiving fund to have a balance of 33 percent or more of the community college district’s unrestricted general fund expenditures for that fiscal year. (c) For a community college district that violates subdivision (a) or (b), the amount of the annual unrestricted general fund balance that exceeds 50 percent shall be proportionally distributed to the nonsupervisory and nonmanagement employees of the community college district based solely on the number of hours worked by those employees in the preceding fiscal year, as determined by a collective bargaining agreement between those employees and the governing board of the community college district.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.